Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2302
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Nurse Practitioner Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-2303 to 38-2314.01 apply.

Laws 1981, LB 379, § 3;

Laws 1984, LB 724, § 3;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 70;

Laws 1996, LB 414, § 13;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 28;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 48;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1706;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 794;

Laws 2015, LB107, § 3.